Washington statutes.
RCW 10.04.120

Stay of execution.

Every defendant may stay the execution for the fine and costs for thirty days, by procuring sufficient sureties, to be approved by the district judge, to enter into recognizance before the district judge for the payment of the fine and costs; the entry of such recognizance shall be made on the docket of the district judge, and signed by the sureties, and shall have the same effect as a judgment, and if the same be not paid in thirty days, the district judge shall proceed as in like cases in the superior court.

[ 1987 c 202 s 154; Code 1881 s 1897; 1873 p 383 s 195; 1854 p 261 s 176; RRS s 1934.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.